Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8208
Report; filing required; form; director; other reports.

(1) Every captive insurer with a certificate of authority to transact business in this state pursuant to the Captive Insurers Act shall file with the director a report, signed and sworn to by its chief officers, of its financial condition as of the end of each fiscal year. The report shall be in a form prescribed by the director and contain such information as the director deems necessary for the purpose of ascertaining whether the captive insurer can continue to meet its policy obligations to its parent, affiliated entities, and claimants. The report shall be filed within sixty days following the end of the captive insurer's fiscal year. The director may require that the report include the information required by section 44-322, including any instructions, procedures, and guidelines consistent with the act.

(2) The director may prescribe the format and frequency of other reports to be filed, which may include, but not be limited to, summary loss reports, quarterly financial statements, audited annual financial statements, holding company statements, biographical information on officers and directors, and other professional reports.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 42.